California, session 20252026, SB1376.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 3508 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:3508. (a) The board may convene from time to time as deemed necessary by the board.(b) Notice of each meeting of the board shall be given at least two weeks in advance to those persons and organizations who express an interest in receiving notification.(c)The board shall receive permission of the director to meet more than six times annually. The director shall approve meetings that are necessary for the board to fulfill its legal responsibilities.